District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Body-Worn Camera Transparency for Use of Force Emergency
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 3004 of the Body-Worn Camera Regulation and Reporting Requirements
Act of 2015, effective October 22, 2015 (D.C. Law 21-36; D.C. Official Code § 5-116.33), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (c)(2)(A) is amended as follows:
(1) Sub-subparagraph (i) is amended as follows:
(A) Sub-sub-subparagraph (I) is amended to read as follows:
“(I) The names and body-worn camera recordings of all
Metropolitan Police Department officers, as well as the names, as available, of all other law
enforcement officers, directly involved in the officer-involved death or serious use of force;
and”.
(B) Sub-sub-subparagraph (II) is amended by striking the phrase “; and”
and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(2) A new sub-subparagraph (i-I) is added to read as follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(i-I) Notwithstanding sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph,
for incidents occurring between August 1, 2025, and the effective date of the Body-Worn
Camera Transparency for Use of Force Emergency Amendment Act of 2026, passed on
emergency basis on March 3, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-616) (“Body-Worn Camera
Transparency Emergency Act”), within 10 business days after the effective date of the Body-
Worn Camera Transparency Emergency Act, publicly release:
“(I) The names and body-worn camera recordings of all
Metropolitan Police Department officers, as well as the names, as available, of all other law
enforcement officers, directly involved in the officer-involved death or serious use of force; and
“(II) A description of the incident; and”.
(3) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
the phrase “; provided, that for all officer-involved deaths since August 1, 2025, the information
reported pursuant to this sub-subparagraph shall include the names of all Metropolitan Police
Department officers as well as other law enforcement officers directly involved in the officer-
involved death; and” in its place.
(b) Subsection (e)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(e)(1) For any incident involving an officer-involved death directly involving an MPD
officer or serious use of force directly involving an MPD officer, MPD officers shall not review
any body-worn camera recordings to assist in initial report writing; provided, that MPD officers
may review body-worn camera recordings to assist in initial report writing for incidents
involving an officer-involved death directly involving a law enforcement officer other than an
MPD officer or serious use of force directly involving a law enforcement officer other than an
MPD officer prior to the effective date of the Body-Worn Camera Transparency Emergency
Act.”.
(c) Subsection (g) is amended as follows:
(1) New paragraphs (1A) and (1B) are added to read as follows:
“(1A) “Law enforcement officer” means any officer, agent, or employee of the
United States or any state or local government authorized by law or by a government agency to
engage in or supervise the prevention, detection, or investigation of any violation of criminal or
civil law.
“(1B) “MPD” means the Metropolitan Police Department.”.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “Metropolitan
Police Department officer” and inserting the phrase “MPD officer, or any other law enforcement
officer while an MPD officer is present” in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “Metropolitan
Police Department officer” and inserting the phrase “MPD officer, or any other law enforcement
officer while an MPD officer is present” in its place.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) The lead-in language of subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the
phrase “Metropolitan Police Department officer” and inserting the phrase “MPD officer, or any
other law enforcement officer while an MPD officer is present” in its place.
(D) Subparagraph (D) is amended by striking the phrase “Metropolitan
Police Department canine” and inserting the phrase “MPD canine, or canine of any other law
enforcement officer while an MPD officer is present” in its place.
Sec. 3. Chapter 39 of Title 24 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 3900 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection 3900.9 is amended to read as follows:
“3900.9.(a) For any incident involving an officer-involved death directly involving an
MPD member or a serious use of force directly involving an MPD member, MPD members shall
not review any BWC recordings to assist in initial report writing; provided, that MPD members
may review body-worn camera recordings to assist in initial report writing for incidents
involving an officer-involved death directly involving a law enforcement officer other than an
MPD member or serious use of force directly involving a law enforcement officer other than an
MPD member prior to the effective date of the Body-Worn Camera Transparency for Use of
Force Emergency Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on March 3, 2026
(Enrolled version of Bill 26-616).
“(b) For an incident other than those described in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
members shall indicate, when writing any initial or subsequent reports, whether the member
viewed BWC footage prior to writing the report and specify what BWC footage the member
viewed.”.
(2) Subsection 3900.10(a)(1) is amended as follows:
(A) Sub-subparagraph (A) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-sub-subparagraph (i) is amended to read as follows:
“(i) The names and body-worn camera recordings of all
Metropolitan Police Department officers, as well as the names, as available, of all other law
enforcement officers, directly involved in the officer-involved death or serious use of force;
and”.
(ii) Sub-sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended by striking the phrase “;
and” and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(B) A new sub-subparagraph (A-i) is added to read as follows:
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A-i) Notwithstanding sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph, for
incidents occurring between August 1, 2025, and the effective date of the Body-Worn Camera
Transparency for Use of Force Emergency Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis
on March 3, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-616), within 10 business days after the effective
date of the Body-Worn Camera Transparency for Use of Force Emergency Amendment Act of
2026, passed on emergency basis on March 3, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-616), publicly
release:
“(i) The names and body-worn camera recordings of all
Metropolitan Police Department officers, as well as the names, as available, of all other law
enforcement officers, directly involved in the officer-involved death or serious use of force; and
“(ii) A description of the incident; and”.
(C) Sub-subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and
inserting the phrase “; provided, that for all officer-involved deaths since August 1, 2025, the
information reported pursuant to this sub-subparagraph shall include the names of all
Metropolitan Police Department officers as well as other law enforcement officers directly
involved in the officer-involved death; and” in its place.
(b) Section 3999.1 is amended by adding a new definition between the definitions of
“FOIA” and “Metadata” to read as follows:
““Law enforcement officer” - means any officer, agent, or employee of the United States
or any state or local government authorized by law or by a government agency to engage in or
supervise the prevention, detection, or investigation of any violation of criminal or civil law.”.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of August 1, 2025.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
5